Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 4 Animal Diseases in General

4-4-1.
Appointment of inspectors to inspect diseased animals — Quarantine — Veterinarians.

The director of environmental management may appoint one or more inspectors in the state, whose duty it is to visit and inquire into the condition of any domestic animal in the state whenever there is reason to suspect that any domestic animal, the carcass of any domestic animal or tissues or products, is affected with a contagious, infectious, zoonotic, or communicable disease; and the inspectors are authorized to quarantine any domestic animal, the carcass of any diseased domestic animal, or restrict the movement of any tissues or products produced by any domestic animal suspected of being affected with a contagious, infectious, zoonotic, or communicable disease until such quarantine or movement restriction is released by a veterinarian employed by the director. The director may also employ, from time to time, any number of veterinary surgeons that he or she may find necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The director of the department of environmental management may establish quarantine or control zones consistent with state and United States Department of Agriculture emergency plans to restrict the movement of animals, animal carcasses, animal tissues, and animal products suspected of being affected with a contagious, infectious, zoonotic, or communicable disease. Any control or quarantine zone established under this authority will remain in effect until the chief of agriculture and/or the state veterinarian determine that the zone is no longer necessary to mitigate the threat of disease.

The director of the department of environmental management may order examination or testing of any quarantined animal or animal in a quarantine or control zone for disease surveillance purposes or as a term of the order of quarantine. The director may authorize qualified department personnel to carry out any examination or testing or may order the testing to be performed by a licensed veterinarian qualified to perform the testing.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, §§ 8, 9; P.L. 1896, ch. 344, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, §§ 8, 9; P.L. 1927, ch. 971, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-1

; P.L. 2014, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 25, § 1, effective May 24, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 26, § 1, effective May 24, 2022.

4-4-1.1.
Animals defined.

This chapter shall apply to all domestic animals defined in §

4-13.1-2(2)

and any animal that the director of the department of environmental management has waived from the permit requirement in accordance with §

4-18-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 143, § 2.

4-4-2.
Compensation of commissioners and veterinarians — Duties — Removal.

Subject to chapter 4 of title 36, the director of environmental management is authorized to fix the compensation of the cattle commissioners and veterinary surgeons, to prescribe their duties, and to remove them when deemed expedient.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 22; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 21; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, §§ 12, 17; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-2

.

4-4-3.
Reporting of diseased animals — Destruction.

Any owner of an animal suspected of having an animal disease determined by the director of environmental management to be contagious or injurious to public health or to the health of other animals, or any veterinarian who treats that animal, or any other person or institution having knowledge of a diseased animal, shall make a report of that information to the state department of environmental management in any manner and form as the department prescribes by regulation. The director of environmental management shall promulgate by rule a list of those animals determined to be contagious or injurious. The director of environmental management, if he or she determines an animal to have a contagious or communicable disease, shall cause that animal to be killed and the carcass to be disposed of in any manner as not to be detrimental to the public health.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 10; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1354, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 9; P.L. 1927, ch. 971, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1.

4-4-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-4

; Repealed by P.L. 1962, ch. 42, § 2.

4-4-5.
Right of entry where disease suspected.

The director of the department of environmental management or the director’s duly authorized representatives, having reason to suspect the existence of any of the diseases mentioned in this chapter upon any grounds or premises, are hereby authorized and empowered to enter upon those grounds or premises for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-5

.

4-4-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 12; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 12; G.L. 1958, ch. 207, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 1962, ch. 54, § 2.

4-4-7.
Compensation for condemned equine animals.

For every horse, ass, or mule condemned and killed as affected with glanders or farcy there shall be paid a sum not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00); provided, however, that no payment is made under the authority of this section for any horse, ass or mule that has not been owned in the state for the period of six (6) months next preceding the condemnation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 31, as enacted by P.L. 1917, ch. 1539, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-7

.

4-4-8.
Exposure of diseased animals to contact with healthy animals.

No person having the care or custody of any animal having any one of the diseases mentioned in this chapter or chapter 5 of this title, shall, knowing the animal to have any of the diseases mentioned in this chapter or chapter 5 of this title, sell or exchange, or permit the removal, use or driving of that animal upon any public highway, or the exposure of that animal to contact with any other healthy animal of the same kind, except by permission of the director of environmental management. Any person so doing is deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on being convicted shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-8

.

4-4-9.
Sale, use, or exposure of diseased animals — Refusal to destroy.

A person who willfully sells or offers to sell, uses, exposes, or causes or permits to be sold, offered for sale, used or exposed, any horse or other animal having the disease known as glanders or farcy, or other contagious or infectious disease dangerous to the life or health of human beings or animals, or which is diseased past recovery, or who refuses upon demand of the general agent or any special agent of the society for the prevention of cruelty to animals humanely to destroy an animal affected with any of those diseases shall, for each offense, be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-2

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 640, § 20; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-9

.

4-4-10.
Sale of diseased or disabled animals.

It is unlawful for any person holding an auctioneer’s license knowingly to receive or offer for sale or to sell at public auction, other than at a sheriff’s or judicial sale under a court order, or for any person to sell or offer for sale at private sale, any animal which is suffering from any disability, lameness or disease, and any person violating any provision of this section shall, for each offense, be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-2

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 640, § 21; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-10

.

4-4-11.
Interference with enforcement — Violation of quarantine.

Any person or persons who shall willfully or intentionally interfere with any officers, duly authorized to carry out the provisions of this chapter is deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is liable to imprisonment not exceeding three (3) months, or a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), or both, at the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-11

.

4-4-12.
Cooperation with federal government in suppression of diseases.

The governor is authorized to accept on behalf of the state the rules and regulations prepared by the secretary of agriculture under and in pursuance of § 3, 21 U.S.C. § 114, of an act of congress approved May 29, 1884, entitled “An act for the establishment of a bureau of animal industry, to prevent the exportation of diseased cattle, and to provide means for the suppression and extirpation of pleuropneumonia and other contagious diseases among domestic animals”, 21 U.S.C. § 113 et seq., and to cooperate with the authorities of the United States in the provisions of that act.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-12

.

4-4-13.
Powers of federal and state inspectors — Assistance by peace officers.

The inspectors of the state department of environmental management and the department of agriculture of the United States, in cooperation with the state department of environmental management, or with any agent of the state, has the right of inspection, quarantine, and condemnation of animals affected with any contagious, infectious, or communicable disease, or suspected to be affected, or that have been exposed to any contagious, infectious, or communicable disease, and for these purposes are authorized and empowered to enter upon any grounds or premises. The director of agriculture or inspectors of the United States department of agriculture, in cooperation with the state department of environmental management, or with any agent of the state department of environmental management have the power to call on deputy sheriffs, constables, and peace officers to assist them in the discharge of their duties in carrying out the provisions of the act of congress approved May 29, 1884, 21 U.S.C. § 113 et seq., establishing the bureau of animal industry, or the provisions of the department of environmental management, and it is made the duty of deputy sheriffs, constables, and peace officers to assist those inspectors or agents when requested, and those inspectors or agents have the same power and protection as peace officers while engaged in the discharge of their duties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 19; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-13

; P.L. 1962, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 11.

4-4-14.
State immunity.

The state is not liable for any damages or expenses incurred under §§

4-4-12

and

4-4-13

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-14

.

4-4-15.
Cooperation in federal Bang’s disease plan.

The state department of environmental management shall cooperate with the United States government in connection with the prevailing federal plan for the control and eradication of Bang’s disease and that department may make reasonable rules and regulations governing the control and eradication of Bang’s disease including federal approved vaccinal procedures; and the general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes in the operation of a plan for the payment of positive reactors to the Bang’s disease test and the eradication of that contagious and infectious disease.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 28; P.L. 1941, ch. 1017, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-15

.

4-4-16.
Compensation for animals killed in Bang’s disease program.

Sections

4-5-1

—

4-5-6

shall be construed to include payments for indemnities for animals killed, and for the testing and administration expense incurred, due to the prevalence of Bang’s disease.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 29; P.L. 1941, ch. 1017, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-16

.

4-4-17.
Importation or exposure of diseased animals.

Any person bringing into the state any neat cattle or other animals which he or she knows to be infected with any infectious or contagious disease, or who exposes the cattle or other animals, known to him or her to be infected, to other cattle and animals not infected with an infectious or contagious disease, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-17

.

4-4-18.
City and town ordinances.

The city and town councils of the several cities and towns may pass any ordinances as they think proper, to prevent the spread of infectious or contagious diseases among cattle and other animals within their cities and towns, and may prescribe penalties for the violation of the ordinances, not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for any one offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-18

.

4-4-19.
Orders prohibiting importation of animals.

The director of environmental management may prohibit the introduction of any cattle or other domestic animals into the state. Any person who brings, transports or introduces any cattle or other domestic animals into the state, after the director has issued an order forbidding the introduction of that cattle or other domestic animal into the state, or after the director has published for five (5) successive days in any newspapers published in this state as the director may direct, an order forbidding that introduction, shall be fined not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) for every offense, and every officer or agent of any company or other person, who violates that order, is subject to the fine. In case of the introduction into the state of cattle or other domestic animals, contrary to the order of the director, the introduction of each animal is deemed a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-19

.

4-4-20.
Publication of information on diseases.

The director of environmental management shall endeavor to obtain full information in relation to any contagious disease which may prevail among cattle or other domestic animals near the borders of the state, and shall publish and circulate that information in his or her discretion. Should any contagious disease break out, or should there be reasonable suspicion of its existence among cattle or other domestic animals in any city or town in the state, he or she shall examine the cases, and publish the result of his or her examination, for the benefit of the public.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-20

.

4-4-21.
Inspectors on roads and railroads.

The director may appoint suitable and discreet persons, on or near the several highways, turnpike roads, railroads, and thoroughfares in the state, who shall inquire into all violations of this chapter and report those violations to the director.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-21

.

4-4-22.
Sale of infected animals or milk.

Any person who sells or offers to sell any cattle or other domestic animals, or any part of these animals, known to him or her to be infected with any contagious disease, or with any disease dangerous to the public health, or who sells or offers to sell any milk from any infected cattle or other domestic animals, shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-22

.

4-4-23.
Regulations for suppression of disease.

The director of environmental management may make all necessary regulations for the prevention, treatment, cure, and extirpation of any disease, and any person who fails to comply with any regulation made shall be fined not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) or be imprisoned not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-23

.

4-4-24.
State rules paramount to local.

Whenever the director of environmental management makes and publishes any regulations concerning the extirpation, cure, or treatment of cattle or other domestic animals infected with, or which have been exposed to any contagious disease, those regulations shall supersede the regulations made by the authorities of the several towns and cities upon that subject, and the operation of those regulations made by those authorities shall be suspended during the time those made by the director are in force.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-24

.

4-4-25.
Signature of orders and notices.

All orders, appointments and notices from the director of environmental management, except the order of notice provided for in §

4-4-19

, shall bear his or her signature.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-25

.

4-4-26.
Limitation of prosecutions.

All prosecutions for offenses against the provisions of §§

4-4-17

—

4-4-25

shall be commenced within thirty (30) days after the offense has been committed, and not afterwards.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 98, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 119, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 245, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 206, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-4-26

.

4-4-27.
Certification of turtles as free of salmonellosis required.

All turtles being sold in this state shall be certified by the seller as being free from salmonellosis. Any person knowingly violating this section shall upon conviction, be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 209, § 1.